Utah statutes.
76-5a-4.   Determination whether material violates chapter.
In determining whether material is in violation of this chapter, the material
need not be considered as a whole, but may be examined by the trier of fact in
part only.  It is not an element of the offense of sexual exploitation of a
minor that the material appeal to the prurient interest in sex of the average
person nor that prohibited conduct need be portrayed in a patently offensive
manner.
